Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 69 60/40 Funding of Public Schools
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-69-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “60/40 Funding of Public Schools Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 12.

16-69-2.
Definition of state-local support.

In defining the percentage of state support to fund elementary and secondary education, the state’s share shall be defined to include appropriations for the following:

Chapter 4 of this title, Permanent School Fund;

Chapter 5 of this title, State Aid;

Chapter 7 of this title, Foundation Level School Support;

Chapter 15 of this title, Teachers’ Pension;

Chapter 23 of this title, Textbooks;

Chapter 24 of this title, Children with disabilities;

Chapter 25 of this title, Education of children who are Deaf or Blind;

Chapter 42 of this title, Education of Gifted Children;

Chapter 45 of this title, Regional Vocational Schools;

Chapter 54 of this title, Education of Limited-English Proficient Students;

Chapter 67 of this title, Rhode Island Literacy and Drop-Out Prevention Act; and

Other educational laws as may be enacted by the general assembly.

The local percentage shall be defined to include all city and town revenues the school district obtains, excluding fees from admissions to school events, and federal aid.

In determining the local percentage of school aid, the board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall adopt rules and regulations pertaining to the definition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 12; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 38; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 38.

16-69-3.
Reports.

Each year the board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall make a report to the governor and the general assembly which shall include the following:

The percent of state support of public education for the last completed fiscal year.

The projected percent of state support for the current fiscal year.

The estimated percent of state support for the ensuing fiscal year.

Recommended steps for the governor and the general assembly to meet spending targets to achieve or maintain 60/40 state-local funding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 12.

16-69-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 12; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 24, effective August 9, 1996.